Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 4

Division of Information Systems

25-4-108. Division of Information Systems — Working groups.

25-4-119. Budget procedures.

25-5-101. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

25-6-101. Purpose.

It is intended that all authority and responsibility of the State Board of Education be administered through the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education under the direction and supervision of the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 64, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-910.1; Acts 1987, No. 771, § 1; 1991, No. 773, § 6; 1991, No. 1244, § 5; 1995, No. 297, § 4; 1999, No. 1323, § 53; 2009, No. 1469, § 30; 2019, No. 910, § 2381.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “Commissioner” for “Director of the Department.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” and substituted “Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Commissioner of Education”.

25-6-102. Organization — Commissioner.

The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall consist of:

The State Board of Education;

The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education under the direction and supervision of the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education; and

Any divisions or subdivisions as presently exist within the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education or as may be created by the State Board of Education or as created by law and placed under the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

The State Board of Education shall continue to perform its powers and duties as prescribed by law.

The commissioner shall be a member of the Governor's cabinet.

The commissioner shall perform all duties and exercise all powers relating to general education as may be granted by law.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted, the 1991 amendment in (d) began “as soon after passage of this act as possible.” Acts 1991, No. 773 was signed by the Governor on March 26, 1991.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “Commissioner” for “Director” in the section heading; and substituted “Commissioner” for “Director of the Department” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” throughout (a); and substituted “Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Commissioner of Education” in (a)(2).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207, the amendment to §25-6-103 by Acts 1999, No. 1318, was superseded by the repeal of this section by Acts 1999, No. 1323.

Publisher's Notes. Former §§25-6-103 —25-6-106, concerning the powers and duties of department and State Board of Education, the authority of the Director of Vocational and Technical Education to enter into contracts, the transfer of powers to the Economic Development Commission and Department of Economic Development, and adult education funds, were repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 55. The sections were derived from the following sources:

25-6-103. Acts 1981, No. 64, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-910.3; Acts 1987, No. 771, § 3; 1999, No. 1318, § 7.

25-6-104. Acts 1983, No. 929, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-910.2; Acts 1987, No. 771, § 15.

25-6-105. Acts 1991, No. 1244, § 30; 1997, No. 540, § 48.

25-6-106. Acts 1991, No. 1246, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (a)(1).

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 56. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

25-6-201. Acts 1993, No. 574, §§ 1, 2.

25-6-202. Acts 1993, No. 574, §§ 3, 6.

25-6-203. Acts 1993, No. 574, § 5.

25-6-204. Acts 1993, No. 574, § 7.

25-6-205. Acts 1993, No. 574, § 9.

For present law, see §25-30-201 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 57. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

25-6-301. Acts 1997, No. 803, § 1.

25-6-302. Acts 1997, No. 803, § 2.

25-6-303. Acts 1997, No. 803, § 3.

25-6-304. Acts 1997, No. 803, § 4.

25-6-305. Acts 1997, No. 803, § 5.

25-6-306. Acts 1997, No. 803, § 6.

25-6-307. Acts 1997, No. 803, § 7.